Hawaii statutes.
[§393-17] Exemption of certain
employees. (a) In addition to the exemption specified in section 393-16,
an employer shall be relieved of the employer's duty under section 393-11 with
respect to any employee who has notified the employer, in the form specified by
the director, that the employee is:

(1) Protected by health insurance or any prepaid
health care plan established under any law of the United States;

(2) Covered as a dependent under a prepaid health
care plan, entitling the employee to the health benefits required by this
chapter;

(3) A recipient of public assistance or covered by a
prepaid health care plan established under the laws of the State governing
medical assistance.

(b) Employers receiving notice of a claim of
exemption under this section shall notify the director of such claim in the
form prescribed by the director. [L 1974, c 210, pt of §1; gen ch 1985]

Previous
Vol07_Ch0346-0398
Next